Alaska statutes. Title 42. Public Utilities and Carriers and Energy Programs.
Article 2. Offenses Relating to Utilities.

Collateral references. —

86 C.J.S. Telecommunications, § 131.

State trespass prosecution for unauthorized entry or occupation, for public demonstration purposes, of business, industrial, or utility, or utility premises. 41 ALR4th 773.

Sec. 42.20.020.
[Renumbered as AS 42.20.085.]

Sec. 42.20.030.
Civil liability for taking utility service and for damages to or interference with a utility line.

A person is civilly liable to the utility whose property is damaged in a sum equal to three times the amount of the actual damages sustained and three times the value of the service taken if the person intentionally or in the exercise of gross negligence

damages a pole, tree, pipeline, or other object used in a utility line;

damages an insulator in use in the line or damages or removes from its insulator any wire used in a utility line;

damages the insulation of the line or interrupts the transmission of the service through it or damages the protective wrapping of a water, oil, or gas pipeline;

damages property or materials belonging to a utility;

interferes with the use of a utility line, or obstructs or postpones the transmission of service over a utility line;

procures or advises damage to any utility line;

interferes with or alters a meter or other device for the measuring of service from a utility; or

without the permission of the utility takes service from the utility or taps a wire or line used for the transmission of service or procures or advises this to be done.

A person is civilly liable to the utility whose property is negligently damaged under (a)(1), (2), (3), (4), or (5) of this section in a sum equal to the amount of the damages sustained.

History.

(§ 49-5-12 ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 39 SLA 1964; am §§ 1, 2 ch 68 SLA 1980)

Sec. 42.20.032.
Presumption from use of unmetered utility service.

It is presumed that a person intended to deprive a utility of compensation for service from the utility if

the person possesses or has access to a utility service metering device that is being used to meter utility service and has been interfered with, avoided, or altered to inhibit or prevent the accurate measurement of utility service without the permission of the utility or the person has access to a utility line that has been tapped without the permission of the utility; and

the person enjoys the use or receives the economic benefit of the unmetered utility service.

History.

(§ 4 ch 68 SLA 1980)

Sec. 42.20.035.
Jurisdiction.

The district court has jurisdiction of civil actions filed under AS

42.20.030

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 68 SLA 1980)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 42.20.031. Renumbered in 1980.

Sec. 42.20.038.
Definitions.

In AS

42.20.030

—

42.20.038

,

“service” means a commodity, product, use, facility, convenience, or other form of service that is offered and provided by a utility;

“utility” means an enterprise, whether publicly or privately owned or operated, that provides gas, electric, steam, water, sewer, or telecommunications service.

History.

(§ 4 ch 68 SLA 1980)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 42.20.034. Renumbered in 1980. Reorganized in 1983.

Sec. 42.20.040.
Removal of instrument or meter or disconnecting of wire.

An agent or employee of a telephone or electric light company may not remove any instrument or meter or disconnect any wire connected to the instrument or meter without notifying the owner, agent, or tenant of the building or room where the instrument or meter is installed.
A notice in writing of the intention to remove the instrument or meter or to disconnect a wire is sufficient if delivered to the owner, agent, or tenant of the building or room before removal or disconnection, or in case of the absence of the owner, agent, or tenant, either by depositing the notice in the post office with postage prepaid, or by posting in a conspicuous place upon the building or room 24 hours before removal or disconnection.
An agent or employee of a telephone or electric light company may not enter a building or room to examine, remove, or disconnect an instrument or meter without first announcing the agent’s or employee’s presence to the occupant.
A person violating this section is guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction, is punishable by a fine of not more than $200, or by imprisonment for not more than 30 days, or by both.

History.

(§ 49-5-13 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 42.20.050.
Altering message; punishment.

History.

[Repealed, § 103 ch 13 SLA 2019.]

Sec. 42.20.060.
Sending or delivering false or forged message; punishment.

History.

[Repealed, § 103 ch 13 SLA 2019.]

Sec. 42.20.070.
Punishment and civil liability for use by employee of information derived from message.

History.

[Repealed, § 103 ch 13 SLA 2019.]

Sec. 42.20.080.
Delaying or refusing to send or deliver message; punishment.

History.

[Repealed, § 103 ch 13 SLA 2019.]

Sec. 42.20.085.
Priority of official communications; penalty for refusal, delay, or alteration of transmission.

History.

[Repealed, § 103 ch 13 SLA 2019.]

Sec. 42.20.090.
Punishment and civil liability for opening or obtaining message addressed to another.

History.

[Repealed, § 103 ch 13 SLA 2019.]

Sec. 42.20.100.
Taking information from wire. [Repealed, § 3 ch 133 SLA 1966.]

Sec. 42.20.110.
Bribing operator or employee to disclose private message; punishment.

History.

[Repealed, § 103 ch 13 SLA 2019.]